Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-402
Sections; purposes.

The purpose of sections 82-401 to 82-408 is to assist and encourage the artistic creations of Nebraska artists through the purchase and display of works of art, to beautify public places by increasing the availability of works of art for exhibition, and to foster appreciation and understanding of art by making it more accessible to the public.

Laws 1979, LB 116, § 2.